District of Columbia statutes.
31-5604.06

Coordination of exemptions.

(a)

In furtherance of the policy stated in § 31-5601.02(b), the exemptions under §§ 31-5604.01, 31-5604.02, and 31-5604.03 shall be coordinated with exemptions for securities and transactions under the Securities Act of 1933 so that an offering registered under the Securities Act of 1933 shall be subject to registration by filing under this chapter in the absence of an exemption under this chapter, and an offering exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933, other than under the exemption for intrastate offerings, shall be exempt from registration under this chapter.

(b)

The Commissioner may make, amend, and rescind rules and regulations for exemptions under §§ 31-5604.01 and 31-5604.02, or added by the Commissioner under § 31-5604.03, but not contained in the Securities Act of 1933 or any of the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 406, 47 DCR 7837